Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3740
Dry bean, defined.

Dry bean shall mean any dry edible bean. Dry bean does not include chickpeas or garbanzo beans.

Laws 1987, LB 145, § 6;

Laws 2020, LB803, § 20.